Wyoming, session 2025, HB0145.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 22-9-110(a) by creating a new
paragraph (iii) and 22-9-111 by creating a new subsection
(c) are amended to read:

22-9-110. Form of absentee ballot envelopes;
distribution.
HB0145

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0552

(a) The secretary of state shall prescribe the form,
and distribute to the clerks responsible for the respective
elections a supply of the following official envelopes:

(iii) The official envelope inside the inner
ballot envelope for the elector to enter identification
information as required by W.S. 22-9-111(c).

22-9-111. Affidavit to be printed on inner envelope;
attestation; identification information on envelope inside
inner envelope.

(c) Each elector, as specified in W.S. 22-9-105,
shall provide the following identification information in
the official envelope inside the inner ballot envelope:

(i) The elector's Wyoming driver's license
number or if the elector has no Wyoming driver's license,
one (1) of the following:

(A) The elector's Wyoming identification
card number issued under W.S. 31-8-101;
HB0145

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0552

(B) The last four (4) digits of the
elector's social security number.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0145